California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(10) County organized health systems contracting with the department pursuant to Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) of Chapter 8 shall certify to the department, in a manner to be specified by the department, that the August 1, 2000, wage pass-through funds, received pursuant to this section in the form of
 capitated rate payments, were passed through to the facilities described in this subdivision.

(g) Any facility which is paid under the rate provided for in
 subdivision (a), (e), or (f) which the director finds has not made the wage and benefit increases provided for shall be liable for the amount of funds paid to the facility based upon the wage and benefit requirements provided for by this section but not distributed to employees for wages and benefits, plus a penalty equal to 10 percent of the funds not so distributed. The facility shall be subject to Section 14107.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 797, Sec. 6.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.7.

(a) The director shall adopt regulations increasing the minimum number of equivalent nursing hours per patient required in skilled nursing facilities to 3.2, in skilled nursing facilities with special treatment programs to 2.3, in intermediate care facilities to 1.1, and in intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled to 2.7.

(b) (1) The director shall adopt regulations that shall establish the minimum number of equivalent nursing hours per
 patient required in the following, for the first year of implementation of the first year of rates established pursuant to this article:

(A) 2.6 hours for skilled nursing facilities.

(B) 1.9 hours for skilled nursing facilities with special treatment programs.

(C) 0.9 hours for intermediate care facilities.

(D) 2.2 hours for intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled.

(2) The staffing standards established by paragraph (1) shall become effective concurrently with the establishment of the first reimbursement rates under this article.

(3) The director shall adopt regulations that establish the minimum number of
 equivalent nursing hours per patient required in skilled nursing facilities at 2.7 for the second year of implementation of rates established pursuant to this article.

(c) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The one-year transition phase from 2.6 to 2.7 equivalent nursing hours allows ample time to restructure staffing.

(B) The 4 percent augmentation to reimburse for direct patient care, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14126.60, provides funds to cover additional expenses, if any, incurred by facilities to implement this staffing standard.

(2) Subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds, the department may adopt regulations to increase the minimum number of equivalent
 nursing hours required of facilities subject to this section per patient beyond 2.7 nursing hours per patient day.

(d) (1) The department shall identify those skilled nursing facilities that are in compliance with the 3.0 minimum double nursing hour standards, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1276.5 of the Health and Safety Code, but have actual staffing ratios below 2.5, as of July 1, 1990, and shall not enforce the 2.7 equivalent nursing hours with respect to those facilities until the third year of implementation of the rates established under this article.

(2) The department shall periodically review facilities that have actual staffing ratios described in paragraph (1) to ensure that they are making sufficient progress toward 2.7 hours.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (d), commencing January 1, 2000, the minimum number of nursing hours per patient day required in skilled nursing facilities shall be 3.2, without regard to the doubling of nursing hours as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1276.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and except as set forth in Section 1276.9 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 685, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.8.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Facility” means any long-term health care facility as defined in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), (g), and (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Resident” means a person who is a facility resident or patient and a Medi-Cal beneficiary and whose facility care is being paid for in whole or in part by Medi-Cal.

(3) “Agent” means a person who manages, uses, or controls those funds or assets of the resident that legally are required to be used to pay the resident’s
 long-term care patient liability and other charges not paid for by the Medi-Cal program.

(4) “Responsible party” means a person other than the resident or potential resident, who, by virtue of signing or cosigning an admissions agreement of a facility, either together with, or on behalf of, a potential resident, becomes personally responsible or liable for payment of any portion of the charges incurred by the resident while in the facility. A person who signs or cosigns a facility’s admissions agreement by virtue of being an agent under a power of attorney for health care or an attorney-in-fact under a durable power of attorney executed by the potential resident, a conservator of the person or estate of the potential resident, or a representative payee, is not a responsible party under this section, and does not thereby assume personal responsibility or liability for payment of any charges incurred by
 the resident, except to the extent that the person, or the resident’s conservator or representative payee is an agent as defined in paragraph (3).

(b) No facility may require or solicit, as a condition of admission into the facility, that a Medi-Cal beneficiary have a responsible party sign or cosign the admissions agreement. No facility may accept or receive, as a condition of admission into the facility, the signature or cosignature of a responsible party for a Medi-Cal beneficiary.

(c) A facility may require, as a condition of admission, where a resident has an agent, that the resident’s agent sign or cosign the admissions agreement and agree to distribute to the facility promptly when due, the
 long-term care patient liability and any other charges not paid for by the Medi-Cal program that the resident or their agent has agreed to pay. The financial obligation of the agent shall be limited to the amount of the resident’s funds received but not distributed to the facility. A new agent who did not sign or cosign the admissions agreement shall be held responsible to distribute funds in accordance with this section.

(d) When a resident on non-Medi-Cal status converts to Medi-Cal coverage, any security
 deposit paid to the facility by the resident or on the resident’s behalf as a condition of admission to the facility shall be returned and the obligations and responsibilities of the resident or responsible party during the time period when the resident is covered by Medi-Cal shall be limited to the obligations and responsibilities provided for under the Medi-Cal program. In the event that the resident becomes ineligible for Medi-Cal coverage at any time subsequent to converting to Medi-Cal coverage, the resident and responsible party shall be bound by the terms of the original admission agreement, or any admission agreement in effect at the time the Medi-Cal coverage commenced.

(e) When a resident on non-Medi-Cal status converts to Medi-Cal coverage, the facility shall make a reasonable attempt to assist the resident in contacting the county to obtain an estimate of the resident’s
 long-term care patient liability.

(f) A resident and their agent shall pay to the facility the long-term care patient liability, for which they are responsible under the Medi-Cal program, unless otherwise exempted by law.

(g) If a resident or
 their agent disputes the amount of the long-term care patient liability owed to a facility, the resident or agent may apply for a state hearing pursuant to Section 10950 for a determination of the amount owed to the facility.

(h) Any agent who willfully violates the requirements of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed 180 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 142.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.9.

No nursing facility or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled may require a security deposit from a Medi-Cal beneficiary who applies for admission to the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 21.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14111.

(a) As permitted by federal law or regulations, for health care services provided in a long-term health care facility that are reimbursed by Medicare, a physician and surgeon may delegate any of the following to a nurse practitioner:

(1) Alternating visits required by federal law and regulations with a physician and surgeon.

(2) Any duties consistent with federal law and regulations within the scope of practice of
 nurse practitioners, so long as all of the following conditions are met:

(A) A physician and surgeon approves, in writing, the admission of the individual to the facility.

(B) The medical care of each resident is supervised by a physician and surgeon.

(C) A physician and surgeon performs the initial visit and alternate required visits.

(b) This section does not authorize benefits not otherwise authorized by federal law or regulation.

(c) All responsibilities delegated to a nurse practitioner pursuant to this section shall be performed under the supervision of the physician and surgeon and pursuant to a standardized procedure among the physician and surgeon, nurse practitioner, and
 facility.

(d) No task that is required by federal law or regulation to be performed personally by a physician may be delegated to a nurse practitioner.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the authority of a long-term health care facility to hire and employ nurse practitioners so long as that employment is consistent with federal law and within the scope of practice of a nurse practitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14111.5.

(a) As permitted by federal law or regulations, for health care services provided in a long-term health care facility that are reimbursed under this chapter, a nurse practitioner may, to the extent consistent with his or her scope of practice, perform any of the following tasks otherwise required of a physician and surgeon:

(1) With respect to visits required by federal law or regulations, making alternating visits, or more frequent visits if the physician and surgeon is
 not available.

(2) Any duty or task that is consistent with federal and state law or regulation within the scope of practice of nurse practitioners, so long as all of the following conditions are met:

(A) A physician and surgeon approves, in writing, the admission of the individual to the facility.

(B) The medical care of each resident is supervised by a physician and surgeon.

(C) A physician and surgeon performs the initial visit and alternate required visits.

(b) This section does not authorize benefits not otherwise authorized by federal or state law or regulation.

(c) All responsibilities undertaken by a nurse
 practitioner pursuant to this section shall be performed in collaboration with the physician and surgeon and pursuant to a standardized procedure among the physician and surgeon, nurse practitioner, and facility.

(d) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, any task that is required by federal law or regulation to be performed personally by a physician may be delegated to a nurse practitioner who is not an employee of the long-term health care facility.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the authority of a long-term health care facility to hire and employ nurse practitioners so long as that employment is consistent with federal law and with the scope of practice of a nurse practitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 186.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14112.

Health care provided pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a lien against the property of any recipient or medically indigent or other person eligible under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14113.

The department shall enter into cooperative arrangements with the Department of Rehabilitation and any other state agency or department responsible for health or vocational rehabilitation services in the state to insure the appropriate utilization of such services in the provision of health care and related remedial services under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

14114.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program Act.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall develop and administer the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan
 Repayment
 Program to provide loan assistance payments to qualifying, recent graduate physicians and dentists that serve beneficiaries of existing health care programs described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), inclusive. To implement this section, the department shall consult with other state entities, including the Department of Health Care Access and Information, and with affected stakeholders.

(c) (1) The
 Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program shall be funded using moneys appropriated to the department for this purpose.

(2) The Loan Repayment Program Account is hereby continued in the State Treasury within the Healthcare Treatment Fund established pursuant to Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The Loan Repayment Program Account shall contain funds appropriated by the
 Legislature from the Healthcare Treatment Fund to the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Loan Repayment Program Account is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to implement the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program.

(3) The Medi-Cal Loan Repayment Program Special Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. The Medi-Cal Loan Repayment Program Special Fund shall contain funds transferred from the California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax Fund pursuant to Section 31005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, funds transferred pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 14197.2, and any other moneys appropriated to the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program other than funds appropriated
 from the Health Care Treatment Fund described in paragraph (2). The department and the State Controller’s office shall maintain separate subaccounts for funds appropriated or transferred from each funding source. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Medi-Cal Loan Repayment Program Special Fund is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to implement the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program.

(4) The department shall expend all funds available in the Loan Repayment Program Account of the Healthcare Treatment Fund prior to expending any funds from the Medi-Cal Loan Repayment Program Special Fund.

(5) Within each fund and subaccount, the department shall administer two separate payment pools for participating physicians and dentists, respectively, consistent with the allocations provided for in Item 4260-102-3305 of the Budget Act of 2018, Item 4260-102-3305 of the Budget Act of 2019, Section 31005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 14197.2.

(6) Moneys
 appropriated to the department to implement this section shall be available to fund the administrative costs incurred by the department and any entity contracted with pursuant to subdivision (g). Administrative costs from the Loan Repayment Program Account of the Healthcare Treatment Fund are limited by subdivision (f) of Section 30130.57 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) The department shall develop the eligibility criteria to be used to evaluate physician and dentist participation in the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment
 Program. In developing these criteria, the department shall prioritize ensuring timely access, limiting geographic shortages of services, and ensuring quality care in the Medi-Cal program. The department shall develop separate criteria for distribution of payments from the physician and dentist payment pools. At a minimum, the department shall establish the maximum number of years a physician or dentist may be in practice to qualify for payments pursuant to this section, and the minimum number of years a participating physician or dentist receiving payments pursuant to this section shall agree to participate as an enrolled provider in the Medi-Cal program.

(e) The selection of physicians and dentists for participation in the
 Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment
 Program and the amount of loan repayment assistance awarded to a participating physician or dentist shall be at the discretion of the department and any entity contracted with pursuant to subdivision (g), and shall be based on the criteria developed pursuant to subdivision (d). An exercise of discretion by the department and its contractors pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to judicial review, except that an applicant physician or dentist who is not selected for participation in the program may file for a writ of mandate pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure to rectify an abuse of discretion by the department and its contractors.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of policy letters, provider bulletins, or other
 similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The department shall consult with affected stakeholders before taking action pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) To implement this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the review or approval of a division of the Department of General Services.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not jeopardized. If the department determines there is a reasonable
 likelihood that federal financial participation is available for expenditures pursuant to this section, it may seek the federal approvals necessary to obtain federal financial participation.

(i) The Legislature finds and declares that the expenditures authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) are all of the following:

(1) Made in accordance with the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) of Chapter 2 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(2) Based on criteria developed and periodically updated as part of the annual
 budget process in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) Consistent with the purposes and conditions for expenditures described in subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(j) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 46, Sec. 6.   (AB 186)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2018, Ch. 47, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.

(a) Bills for service under this chapter shall be submitted not more than six months after the month in which the service is rendered, and shall be in the form prescribed by the director, except that in the event the patient does not identify himself or herself to the provider as a Medi-Cal beneficiary within four months after the month in which the service was rendered, the provider shall be entitled to submit his or her statement at any time within 60 days after that date certified by the provider as the date the patient was first
 identified as a Medi-Cal beneficiary. However, the date certified by the provider as the date the patient was first so identified shall not be later than one year after the month in which the service was rendered. Whenever a provider has submitted a claim to a liable third party, the provider shall have one year after the month in which the service is rendered for submission of the bill. Whenever a legal proceeding has been commenced with either an administrative or judicial tribunal concerning a bill for which the provider is attempting to obtain payment from a liable third party, the provider shall have one year in which to submit the bill after the month in which the services have been rendered. A copy of the pleadings shall be conclusively presumed to be sufficient evidence of commencement of a legal proceeding.

(b) The director may, where he or she finds that delay in the submission of bills was caused by circumstances beyond the control
 of the provider, extend the period for submission of bills for a period not to exceed one year.

(c) (1) Reimbursement for an original claim, submitted for payment between 6 and 12 months after the month of service, that does not meet any of the exceptions allowing billing after six months as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), or the exception specified in subdivision (f), shall be reduced as follows:

(A) The amount otherwise payable by Medi-Cal shall be reduced by 25 percent for claims submitted during the seventh through the ninth month after the month of service.

(B) The amount otherwise payable by Medi-Cal shall be reduced by 50 percent for claims submitted during the 10th through the 12th month after the month of service.

(2) The director may establish exceptions through regulations, for claims submitted beyond the one-year billing limitation, to the extent full federal participation is available.

(3) The reductions specified in paragraph (1) shall not apply to a Medi-Cal program for which there is no state General Fund match, including, but not limited to, the Local Educational Agency (LEA) Medi-Cal Billing Option program and the Targeted Case Management (TCM) program.

(d) For the purposes of this section, identification of a patient as a Medi-Cal beneficiary shall mean presentation to the provider of the patient’s Medi-Cal card.

(e) No further followup shall be required, after the provider receives acknowledgment of a claim inquiry from the fiscal intermediary, until the claim is paid or denied, except that this period
 shall not exceed one year from the date of acknowledgment. Within one year from the date of acknowledgment the next level of appeal shall be utilized by the provider.

(f) To the extent permitted by federal law, when a state of emergency has been declared by either the President of the United States or the Governor, the director, in order to ensure continued access to health care services, may remit payment for services without the submission of required documentation, to any provider in good standing under the Medi-Cal program who, due to destruction, loss, or inaccessibility of data as a result of the emergency situation, is unable to submit claims. Emergency payments may be made for a period of up to six months from the date of the emergency declaration. All requests for emergency payment shall include adequate justification for payment, as required by the director, and shall be paid based on the previous claims history of the requesting
 provider held by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 248.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.1.

The department may not require that any hospital based physician submit a combined charge, which includes the physician and hospital charge, if it is not the customary practice of such physician to submit a combined charge. The physician’s right to bill independently shall be respected by the department; provided, however, this shall not prevent the department from enacting reasonable regulations to insure that the total charges, when a hospital and physician bill separately, do not exceed the total charge when both bill for the same services in a combined charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.2.

(a) The department shall not require nursing facilities or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code to originate monthly bills for beneficiaries if the following conditions are met:

(1) A claim on which inpatient per diem days have been billed by the provider is received by the fiscal intermediary by the fifth working day of the month following the month being billed; and

(2) The claim
 received by the fiscal intermediary does not show a patient status code that indicates discharge or death on the last day billed for the recipient for that month.

(b) When the conditions listed above are met, the fiscal intermediary shall, by the 20th of the month, mail to the provider a preimprinted claim to cover the current month’s services to those beneficiaries.

(c) The provider shall be required to check the preimprinted claim for accuracy, to make corrections, and to certify that the beneficiaries who are listed on the claim received the services listed.

(d) The preimprinted claim shall be returned in the manner required by Section 14115; provided, the preimprinted claim shall be deemed a late submission no earlier than six months following the end of the month of service being billed.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the rights and duties of providers and the department with respect to the billing procedures hereby established shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 22.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.3.

The department shall permit a nurse anesthetist to bill independently for services rendered by such nurse anesthetist. If a nurse anesthetist chooses to bill independently for such services, the department shall make the payment for the services directly to the nurse anesthetist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.4.

If the Budget Act should in any budget year restrict payment for pathology services under the Medi-Cal program to only the provider who actually performs those services, this restriction shall not prohibit any of the following:

(a) Reimbursement of a hospital for pathology services performed by an outside reference laboratory for hospital patients.

(b) Reimbursement of a clinical laboratory for performance of pathology services that are referred to another clinical laboratory.

(c) Reimbursement of a clinical laboratory when pathology services are performed at a different testing location owned and operated by the same clinical laboratory.

Services provided pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) shall be reimbursed in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 960, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.41.

(a) For services that are performed at a central laboratory as authorized pursuant to Section 1241.1 of the Business and Professions Code, the department shall provide reimbursement directly to the laboratory performing the services and submitting the claim for reimbursement. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a primary care clinic network that utilizes centralized billing from submitting claims on the behalf of the network’s central laboratory, if the claims are submitted with the central laboratory’s provider number. The department
 shall not deny payment to a laboratory created pursuant to Section 1241.1 of the Business and Professions Code, for either of the following reasons:

(1) The clinic and the licensed central laboratory performing the services are owned and operated by the same nonprofit corporation with the same board of directors and the same corporate officers.

(2) The laboratory services are performed on a specimen collected at the clinic for a clinic patient.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a primary care clinic to submit a separate claim for central laboratory services currently reimbursed under the Medi-Cal program, utilizing the primary care clinic’s provider number.

(c) The department may implement utilization controls or other cost-control
 measures to ensure that medically necessary services are appropriately rendered.

(d) (1) A primary care clinic licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code that is affiliated with a network of primary care clinics may continue to submit claims for the laboratory services provided until such time that the primary care clinic receives a provider number for the central laboratory pursuant to this section, if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The network of primary care clinics is operated by the same nonprofit corporation with the same board of directors and corporate officers.

(B) The primary care clinic operates under the same procedures and protocols as the affiliated clinics in the network, and the laboratory holds a valid Clinical Laboratory
 Improvement Amendments of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 263a) (CLIA) certificate and state laboratory license to perform moderate and high complexity laboratory services.

(C) The of primary care clinic has been providing laboratory testing services for the patients of the primary care clinic within the clinic network prior to August 1, 2006, and has been authorized by Medi-Cal to submit claims for those services.

(2) This subdivision shall remain operative until June 30, 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 795, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.5.

Moneys payable or rights existing under this chapter shall be subject to any claim, lien or offset of the State of California, and any claim of the United States of America made pursuant to federal statute, but shall not otherwise be subject to enforcement of a money judgment or other legal process, and no transfer or assignment, at law or in equity, of any right of a provider of health care to any payment shall be enforceable against the state, a fiscal intermediary or carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 183.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.7.

(a) The department, with the assistance of the Controller, shall develop a procedure by which approved claims for services rendered may be reimbursed through a means of electronic transfer of funds to designated providers of services.

(b) The department shall make the electronic transfer of funds for the payment of approved claims for services rendered pursuant to this chapter available to all interested parties for a reasonable initial fee, and an annual subscription fee for system updating, maintenance, and support services provided to users.

(c) The department shall charge fees pursuant to subdivision (b) in an amount which shall recover, as nearly as possible, the cost of provider enrollment, bank transaction charges, and ongoing net support costs for maintenance of the electronic transfer system.

(d) The department shall, in charging fees pursuant to subdivision (b), adjust those fees by the amount of any administrative savings due to the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.75.

(a) As a condition of payment for goods, supplies, and merchandise provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries by a provider that receives or makes annual payments of at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) under the Medi-Cal program, the provider shall comply with the federal False Claims Act employee training and policy requirements contained in Section 1902(a) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.
 Sec. 1396a(a)(68)), and with any requirements that the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services may specify. The calculation of the five million dollar ($5,000,000) threshold shall be based on federal law and regulations and guidance from the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(b) For purposes of this section, “provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14043.1, and also includes any Medi-Cal managed care plan authorized under this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 367, Sec. 13.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14115.8.

(a) (1) The department shall amend the Medicaid state plan with respect to the billing option for services by local educational agencies (LEAs), to ensure that schools shall be reimbursed for all eligible services that they provide that are not precluded by federal requirements.

(2) The department shall examine methodologies for increasing school participation in the Medi-Cal Billing Option for LEAs so that schools can meet the health care needs of their students.

(3) The department, to the extent possible, shall simplify claiming processes for LEA billing.

(4) The department shall eliminate and modify state plan and regulatory requirements that exceed federal requirements when they are unnecessary.

(5) (A) The department shall, in consultation with the LEA Ad Hoc Workgroup established pursuant to subdivision (c), and consistent with any applicable federal requirements, issue and regularly maintain a program guide for the LEA Medi-Cal Billing Option program. The program guide shall contain a billing manual that includes, but is not limited to, an explanation of billing, auditing, costs reporting, time studies, federal and state compliance rules, fiscal and programmatic compliance information regarding processes, documentation, and guidance necessary for the proper submission of claims, and auditing of LEAs, charter schools, and community colleges, as required
 under the LEA Medi-Cal Billing Option program.

(B) The program guide described in subparagraph (A) shall include, but not be limited to, state plan amendments, Frequently Asked Questions, policy and procedure letters, a plain language explanation of the certified public expenditure processes used to report and reconcile program costs from interim reimbursement to final cost settlement, trainings, provider manuals, and all other types of instructional materials relevant to the LEA Medi-Cal Billing Option program.

(C) (i) The department shall distribute the program guide to all participating LEAs, charter schools, and community colleges by January 1, 2020. Distribution of the program guide may occur by electronic mail or by notification by electronic mail of
 the posting of the guide on the department’s internet website.

(ii) The department shall distribute an updated program guide to all participating LEAs, including charter schools and community colleges, by July 1, 2024, that includes the requirements described in subparagraphs (A) and (B). The department may distribute the program guide by electronic mail or by notification by electronic mail of the posting of the guide on the department’s internet website.

(D) The department shall only adopt a revision of the program guide after providing 30 calendar days’ written notification of the revision, including a statement of justification, to the LEA Ad Hoc Workgroup and all other participating LEAs, charter schools, and community colleges. The department may provide written notice by
 electronic mail. Under extraordinary circumstances, when revisions are necessary to reflect changes required by state or federal law or otherwise mandated by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and those changes require immediate action, the department may provide less than 30 calendar days’ written notice.

(b) The department shall conduct an audit of a Medi-Cal Billing Option claim consistent with, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) (A) The program guide and any revisions made pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), including any revisions that are necessary to reflect changes required by state or federal law or otherwise mandated by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that are in effect at the time
 the service was provided.

(B) Generally accepted accounting principles.

(C) Federal audit regulations, as set forth in Part 200 (commencing with Section 200.0) of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations (Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards), or its successor.

(D) Reasonable cost principles under the federal Medicare Program, as set forth in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(E) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Provider Reimbursement Manual Part 1 (CMS Publication 15-1).

(F) Any and all applicable federal or state statutes and regulations.

(2) (A) The department shall complete an audit and notify an LEA of the audit findings within 18 months of the date that the Cost and Reimbursement Comparison Schedule (CRCS) is submitted. This timeline may be extended by no more than three months upon a determination that the LEA has not provided sufficient documentation as requested by the auditor.

(B) The department shall provide an interim settlement or final settlement of the Medi-Cal share of each LEA’s costs within 12 months of the March 1 due date of the CRCS.

(C) When a final settlement is not issued within 12
 months of the March 1 due date, the department shall complete final settlement no later than 18 months after the date that the CRCS is submitted.

(D) LEAs shall be reimbursed for all eligible services that meet federal requirements.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, an audit shall refer to the audit and cost recovery process described in Section 14170.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may issue and regularly maintain the program guide described in this section without taking regulatory action.

(d) If a rate study for the LEA Medi-Cal Billing Option is